California statutes. Public Utilities Code
If the board elects to avail itself of county assessments, it shall, before September 1st, fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each one hundred dollars ($100), using as a basis the value of property as ascertained from the equalized assessment rolls of the county or counties. The rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board. These acts by the board are a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

16652.

Immediately after fixing the rate of taxes the board shall transmit to the county auditors of the counties in which the district is situated a statement of the rate so fixed by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16653.

The county auditors shall compute and enter in the assessment rolls, the district tax on the property enumerated and assessed as being in the district, using the rate of levy fixed by the board, and the assessed value as found in the assessment rolls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

16654.

Taxes levied pursuant to Sections 16648 to 16653, inclusive, shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected, the net amount, as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16655.

Each county auditor and tax collector shall annually file with the board of supervisors of his county itemized statements showing the additional expense to his office caused by performance of the duties imposed upon him by this article. Upon the filing of such statements the board of supervisors, by an order upon its minutes, shall deduct such expenses from the tax money of the district while in the hands of the tax collector and transfer the amount deducted into the county salary fund. Not more than one-half of 1 percent on the amount collected shall be so charged or deducted by any county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16656.

The boards of supervisors may provide extra help for their county offices or officers as in their judgment is necessary for the proper performance of their duties under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16657.

Whenever any real property situate in any district which has availed itself of county assessments has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid by the county treasurer receiving it to the district, in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16658.

District taxes are a lien on the property on which they are levied, except that if, during the year preceding the date on which the first installment of real property taxes which evidence the charges appears on the roll, any real property to which such lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to such real property and the costs of such charges relating to such property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection. The enforcement of the collection of district taxes may be had in the same manner and by the same means as is provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1137, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

16659.

Where a district has not availed itself of county assessments, delinquent property sold by the tax collector of the district for delinquent taxes shall be struck off by him to the district and shall thereafter be redeemed or disposed of as is provided by law in the case of delinquent property sold to the State for delinquent county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16660.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, in the case of a sale of property for taxes or assessments, except where the sale is conducted and the funds are accounted for as provided in Division 1 (commencing with Section 101) of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all proceeds shall be accounted for and distributed as provided in Article 12 (commencing with Section 53925) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Payment of Claims Against Districts [16681. - 16682.]

16681.

No claims shall be paid until allowed by the board, and only upon a warrant signed by any two officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16682.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Acquisition of Works [16801. - 16885.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition to Acquire Works [16801. - 16817.]

16801.

As used in this chapter “acquisition of public utility works” includes construction, completion, or acquisition of public utilities or public utility works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16802.

Whenever any petition signed by electors of the district equal in number to 15 percent of all votes cast within the district at the last preceding general election of state and county officers is presented to the board asking for the acquisition of public utility works therein named, the clerk shall immediately examine and verify the signatures and certify the result of the examination to the board. If the required number of signatures is found genuine, the clerk shall transmit to the president of the board an authentic copy of the petition, without the signatures thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16803.

Upon receiving a petition certified to contain the required number of signatures, the board shall formulate for submission to the electors of the district at a general district election or at a special election called for that purpose a separate proposition for the acquisition of each public utility works named in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16804.

In the formulation of a proposition the board shall procure plans and estimates of the cost of original construction and completion by the district of the public utility or, in case of the proposed acquisition of an existing utility works, the cost of original construction and completion by the district of similar works. The board shall also procure an estimate of the revenues that can be expected from the public utility works named in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16805.

In securing estimates of the cost of original construction and completion of water works by the district, the board shall procure and place on file plans and estimates of the cost of obtaining from such sources as the board finds and designates as available a sufficient supply of good, pure water for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16806.

Before submitting propositions to the electors for the acquisition of any public utility works, the board shall solicit and consider offers for the sale to the district of existing utilities, or utility works of the same character, or such portion thereof as would be useful to the district, in order that the district may have the benefit of acquiring them at the lowest possible cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16807.

The board may apply to the Public Utilities Commission to ascertain the value of existing utility works for the purpose of submitting to the electors estimates of the cost of acquiring them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16808.

Upon application by the board the commission without delay shall make a valuation in accordance with Chapter 8, Part 1 of Division 1 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16809.

When the commission has made and filed its findings and decision, the board may have the findings reviewed in accordance with Chapter 8, Part 1 of Division 1, or the board may immediately adopt the findings and decision as the basis of its estimate of the cost of acquiring the public utility works by purchase or by condemnation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16810.

Upon the filing of plans and estimates the board shall determine whether the cost of the public utility works proposed for acquisition can be paid from revenues of the district from the operation of its public utilities in addition to the other necessary expenses of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16811.

When the cost of any public utility works named in a petition can be paid out of the revenues of the district derived from the operation of its public utilities, in addition to the other necessary expenses of the district, each proposition therefor submitted to the electors shall specify the cost of the public utility works proposed for acquisition by the district, the proposed method and manner of its payment, and the question whether the utility works shall be acquired upon such terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16812.

If the cost of any public utility works named in a petition so far exceeds the revenues of the district derived from the operation of its public utilities, in addition to the other necessary expenses of the district, that it is necessary to incur a district bonded indebtedness, each proposition shall specify the amount of the necessary bonded indebtedness, its rate of interest, and the question whether such bonded indebtedness shall be incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16813.

At the next regular meeting after formulation of a proposition for the acquisition of the public utility works, the board by ordinance shall submit the proposition to the electors of the district at a general district election or at a special district election called for the purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16814.

All propositions formulated pursuant to Section 16803 shall be submitted within six months after filing of the petitions, unless more time is required for obtaining a valuation requested of the Public Utilities Commission, in which case the propositions shall be submitted as soon as possible after the valuation becomes final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16815.

The affirmative vote of a majority of the electors voting upon the proposition is necessary to accept a proposition submitted under Section 16811.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16816.

The affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the electors voting upon the proposition is necessary to approve a proposition submitted under Section 16812 and to warrant the issuance of district bonds therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16817.

At as early a date after determination of the election result as the board deems is for the best interests of the district, it shall undertake proceedings and enter into the negotiations and contracts necessary for the acquisition of the public utility works named in any proposition approved by the majority of the electors voting at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Resolution to Acquire Works [16841. - 16846.]

16841.

Whenever the board determines that the public interest or necessity of the district demands the acquisition of any public utility works, it shall specifically declare such determination by a resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16842.

The board shall procure plans and estimates and negotiate for offers for the sale to the district of existing public utility works in the same manner as specified in Article 1 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16843.

When the cost of the public utility works can be paid out of the revenues of the district derived from the operation of its public utilities, in addition to the other necessary expenses of the district, as soon after the filing of the plans and estimates as the board deems is for the best interests of the district, it shall by ordinance determine to acquire such public utility works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16844.

The ordinance shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in some newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district or, if there is no such newspaper in the district, in some newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county where all or part of the district is situated. The ordinance shall state the proposed cost of the acquisition and the proposed method and manner of its payment. If the ordinance involves the expenditure of more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), it shall not become effective until 30 days after its final passage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

16845.

If the cost of the public utility works so far exceeds the revenues of the district derived from the operation of its public utilities, in addition to the other necessary expenses of the district, that it is necessary to incur a district bonded indebtedness, the board, at a regular meeting held within 60 days after the filing of the plans and estimates of cost and expected revenue, by ordinance shall submit the proposition as to whether bonded indebtedness shall be incurred for acquisition of the public utility works, to the electors of the district at a general district election or at a special district election called for the purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16846.

Propositions submitted pursuant to Section 16845 shall specify the amount of bonded indebtedness necessary for the acquisition of the public utility works, the rate of interest thereon, and the question whether the bonded indebtedness shall be incurred. The affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the electors voting at the election upon the proposition is necessary to warrant the issuance of district bonds for the acquisition of any public utility works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Joint Acquisition and Use of Sewage Facilities and Water Works [16871. - 16885.]

16871.

As used in this article, “public agency” includes the Federal Government or any of its branches, and any county, city, district, or other public corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16872.

As used in this article, “sewage disposal facilities” includes sewers or other works or facilities for the handling, treatment, or disposal of sewage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16873.

A district may contract with any public agency or with any person, firm, or corporation, for the joint acquisition, construction, or use of any sewage disposal facilities for the servicing of the public utility district and such other area as may be designated in the contract, when in the judgment of the board it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16874.

A contract may provide for the construction and maintenance of sewage disposal facilities, and for the payment by or for the parties to the contract of such proportionate part of the cost of their acquisition, construction, or maintenance as may be stated in the contract. The payments shall be made at such times and in such amounts as provided by the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16875.

A contract may provide for the joint use of any sewage disposal facilities upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties to the contract, and for the flowage, treatment or disposal of sewage from such area for each of the parties as may be described in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16876.

A district which has acquired or constructed or which proposes to acquire or construct any sewage disposal facilities, may contract with any public agency or with any person, firm, or corporation for the use of any such sewage disposal facilities by any such public agency, or for the flowage, treatment, or disposal of sewage from any area designated by the person, firm, or corporation so contracting, upon such terms and conditions as may be provided in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16878.

Sections 16873 to 16876, inclusive, shall be liberally construed to the end that sewer systems may be planned for areas requiring sewers, which may not all be in one district, and that any sewage disposal facilities required or constructed by any public utility district may be used to the fullest capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16879.

Any contract or agreement made under Sections 16873 to 16876, inclusive, is not subject to the limitations of Section 16474.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16880.

A district may contract with any public agency or with any person, firm, or corporation for the joint acquisition or construction or use of any water works or other facilities for supplying water to the public utility district or such other public agency and to such other area as may be designated in the contract, when in the judgment of the board of directors of the public utility district it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16881.

A contract may provide for the construction and maintenance of water works or other facilities and for the payment by or for the parties to the contract of such proportionate part of the cost of the acquisition, construction, or maintenance of such water works or other facilities as may be stated in the contract. Payments shall be made at such time and in such amounts as provided by the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16882.

A contract may provide for the joint use of any water works or other facilities upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties to the contract for such area for each of the parties as may be described in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16883.

A district which has acquired or constructed or which proposes to acquire or construct any water works or other facilities for supplying water to the district may contract with any public agency, or with any person, firm, or corporation for the use of any such water works or facilities by the public agency for the furnishing of water to any area designated by such public agency, person, firm, or corporation upon such terms and conditions as may be provided in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16884.

No agreement under Sections 16880 to 16883, inclusive, shall run for a longer period than 30 years; provided that in case bonds are issued to finance such waterworks, such agreement may be extended until such bonds are matured and redeemed. Any contract made with the federal government or any branch thereof is not subject to this restriction or limitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

16885.

Sections 16880 to 16884, inclusive, shall be liberally construed to the end that water works and systems may be planned by public utility districts for areas requiring them which may not all be in one district and to the end that they may be used to the fullest capacity. Any contract or agreement made under these sections is not subject to the limitations provided in Section 16474, and such a contract or agreement made with the Federal Government, or any branch thereof, is not subject to the limitations provided in Section 16573.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Bonds [17001. - 17009.]

17001.

District bonds shall be of such form and shall be redeemed at such times and in such amounts as the board may from time to time prescribe. However, the redemption of the bonds shall begin in not more than 15 years and shall be completed in not more than 75 years from the date of issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

17002.

The bonds are payable, principal and interest, in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17003.

The interest on the bonds, other than bonds for sewage works, shall not exceed 8 percent a year. The interest on bonds for sewage works shall not exceed 8 percent a year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

17004.

The bonds shall be issued in such denomination or denominations as the board may prescribe and may be sold by the board at such times and in such manner as it determines, but at not less than par and accrued interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

17005.

District bonds have the same force, value, and use as bonds issued by a municipality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17006.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds shall be placed in the treasury to the credit of the proper fund, and shall be applied exclusively to the purposes and objects mentioned in the ordinance authorizing their issue until such objects are fully accomplished, after which, if any surplus remains, the surplus may be transferred to the general fund, except that a surplus exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be wholly transferred to the appropriate fund to pay interest and maintain the sinking fund, or provide for the retirement of the bonded indebtedness in connection with which the surplus remains.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17007.

The bonds shall be signed by the president of the board and countersigned by the clerk, and shall have the seal of the district attached. The coupons shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the treasurer, by original or facsimile signature, and the bonds and coupons shall be payable at the office of the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17008.

Notwithstanding the fact that an officer whose signature, countersignature, or attestation appears on any bonds or coupons thereof ceases to be such officer before the sale or delivery of such bonds, his signature, countersignature, or attestation appearing either on the bonds or the coupons, or on both, is valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until the sale or delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17009.

In determining the amount of bonds to be issued, the legislative body may include:

(a) All costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the acquisition, construction, improving or financing of the project.

(b) All engineering, inspection, legal and fiscal agent’s fees, costs of the bond election and of the issuance of said bonds, bond reserve funds and working capital and bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period of not to exceed 12 months after completion of construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Adoption of Improvement Acts [17010. - 17013.]

17010.

Whenever, in the opinion of the board, the public interest or convenience may require, it may order to be done in, under, or upon the whole or any portion of any one or more of the streets or public places of the district, or any property or rights-of-way owned by the district, any work or improvement which the district is authorized to do and provide that the cost thereof shall be assessed upon the lots and lands fronting on the streets or public places, or upon any district which may be assessed therefor, and which need not be composed of lands contiguous to each other. The Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, as now or hereafter provided, are applicable to districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

17011.

In the application of said acts to proceedings under this section the terms used in said acts shall have the following meanings:

(a) “City council” and “council” mean board;

(b) “City” and “municipality” mean district;

(c) “Clerk” and “city clerk” mean secretary;

(d) “Superintendent of streets” and “street superintendent” and “city engineer” mean the engineer of the district, or any other person appointed to perform such duties;

(e) “Tax collector” means county tax collector;

(f) “Treasurer” and “city treasurer” mean the treasurer of the public utility district, unless the district elects to use the county treasurer as provided in Section 16036, in which case it is the county treasurer as ex officio treasurer of the district;

(g) “Right-of-way” means any parcel of land in, on, under or through which a right-of-way or easement has been granted to the district for the purpose of constructing or maintaining or work or improvements which the district is authorized to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

17012.

The powers and duties conferred by said acts and supplementary acts upon boards, officers, and agents of cities shall be exercised by the board, officers, and agents of the district, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

17013.

The improvements authorized to be constructed or acquired by this chapter are restricted to those permitted to be constructed or acquired pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Validating Proceedings [17101. - 17101.]

17101.

An action to determine the validity of bonds or indebtedness, authorized for the acquisition, construction, or completion of any public utility or public utility works, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. For such purpose an indebtedness shall be deemed to be in existence upon its authorization.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1521.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Annexation [17301. - 17381.]



  ARTICLE 1. Annexation of Unincorporated Territory [17301. - 17302.]

17301.

Unincorporated territory contiguous or noncontiguous to a district may be annexed to the district in the manner provided in the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (commencing with Section 56000 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 413.)
-------------------------------------------

17302.

Any district in the Lake Tahoe Basin which is able to provide to incorporated territory contiguous to such district a sewer system and treatment facilities sufficient to handle and treat any resultant sewage and provide transportation facilities sufficient to transport any resultant sewage effluent outside the Lake Tahoe Basin may annex such territory in the manner provided in the District Reorganization Act of 1965 unless the city of which such territory is a part provides or has undertaken to provide such sewer system, treatment and transportation facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 556.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Annexation of Noncontiguous Territory [17360. - 17381.]

17360.

As used in this article, “petitioning district” means any public utility district, water district, or irrigation district containing land which is to be annexed to a public utility district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17361.

As used in this article, “annexing district” means any public utility district to which land is to be annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17362.

Land not a part of and not contiguous to any district, containing at least 10 privately owned acres, and lying within the exterior boundaries of any petitioning district, the nearest boundary of which is within three miles of the nearest boundary of the annexing district may be annexed to the annexing district in the manner provided in this article or in the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (commencing at Section 56000, Government Code). When proceedings for such annexation are taken pursuant to this article, only the provisions of this article shall apply thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

17363.

The board of directors or other governing body of the petitioning district may request by petition that lands lying within its boundaries and described in the petition be annexed to the annexing district upon such terms and conditions as are set forth in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17364.

The petition shall be addressed to the board of directors of the annexing district and filed with the secretary of the annexing district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17365.

The execution and filing of the petition by the petitioning district shall be authorized by resolution of its board of directors and a certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17366.

If the board of directors of the annexing district determines that the annexation of the territory will facilitate the acquisition, construction, completion, or operation of any public utilities works of the petitioning district, or the annexing district, and will not operate to the disadvantage of the annexing district, and that the territory proposed to be annexed will be benefited by the annexation, it shall determine the terms and conditions upon which the annexation shall be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17367.

In the terms and conditions, the board may provide for any of the following:

(a) That the territory to be annexed shall not become liable by assessment or otherwise (1) for any of the outstanding obligations of the annexing district; (2) for any expense incurred in acquiring property used or to be used for the servicing of any land within the exterior boundaries of the annexing district as they then exist; (3) for any costs or charges incurred in connection with the replacement or construction of any utility system or for the delivery of any commodity or service within the annexing district.

(b) That the land to be annexed shall be subject to such assessments and charges as required to provide (1) for any utility system or property necessary to serve the annexed land; (2) for the costs of maintaining, servicing, and operating such properties.

(c) That the liability of the land to be annexed may be limited solely to the fixing and collecting of charges for utilities or commodities actually supplied to the petitioning district by the annexing district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17368.

The terms and conditions may also provide for any of the following:

(a) That any and all property, services, or commodities may be delivered directly to the petitioning district.

(b) That the annexation may be made contingent upon the annexing district obtaining the necessary approval for the annexing of such lands from any and all agencies, authorities, and districts of which the annexing district may be a member.

(c) That the annexed territory may be required to waive and will not be entitled to receive, use, or participate in any services, commodities, or property or some specific part thereof which may be owned by the annexing district, or to which it may be entitled.

(d) Any other terms and conditions authorized by the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (commencing at Section 56000, Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

17369.

The terms and conditions shall become effective and binding upon the annexing district and upon the territory to be annexed and the petitioning district when approved in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17370.

The resolution of the board of directors of the annexing district shall describe the territory proposed to be annexed and set forth the terms and conditions at length upon which the annexation is proposed to be made, and declare the board’s intention of approving such annexation upon the terms and conditions therein specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17370.1.

After the board of directors of the annexing district shall have adopted a resolution declaring its intention of approving an annexation the secretary of such district shall file a certified copy of such resolution with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

17370.2.

After said resolution has been filed with the executive officer, proceedings thereon shall be taken by the local agency formation commission in the manner and subject to the provisions of Part 4 (commencing at Section 56250, Government Code) of the District Reorganization Act of 1965. If the resolution and proposed annexation are approved by the commission, with or without amendment, wholly, partially or conditionally, it shall be mandatory for the board of directors of the annexing district to complete the proceedings for such annexation, subject to compliance with the commission’s resolution making determinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

17371.

After receipt of the resolution of the local agency formation commission making determinations, the board of directors of the annexing district shall cause publication of its resolution declaring its intention of approving such annexation and a notice fixing the time and place of hearing thereon and notifying all persons interested in or that may be affected by the proposed annexation of territory to appear at the meeting and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the territory or any part of it should not be annexed as proposed in the resolution. The notice and resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the annexing district, or if there is no such newspaper, in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county where all or a part of the annexing district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

17372.

The time fixed for hearing shall not be less than 20 days nor more than 60 days after the date of the first publication of the resolution, and the notice and resolution shall be posted in three public places in the territory proposed to be annexed at least 15 days before the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17373.

At the hearing or any continuance thereof, the board of directors of the annexing district shall hear all relevant evidence and shall determine whether the territory shall be annexed and upon what terms and conditions, if any, such annexation shall be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17374.

At the hearing or any prior time, any person interested may file with the board of directors of the annexing district a written protest to the proposed annexation or to the approval of the terms and conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17375.

If written protests are filed by the owners of taxable property in the territory proposed to be annexed, the board of directors shall refer the protests to the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is situated. The board of supervisors shall thereupon hold a hearing on the protests after notice given in the manner provided in Article 2, Chapter 2 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17376.

If the board of supervisors finds and determines at the hearing that the property described in the protests will not be substantially benefited by annexation to the district, it may notify the board of directors of the annexing district that such property shall not be annexed to the district, and the board of directors shall take the necessary steps to exclude the property from the territory proposed to be annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

17377.

Any person who is interested in any land located within the annexing district or the territory to be annexed and who does not file a written protest is deemed to have assented to the annexation of the territory set forth in the petition of the petitioning district, and upon the terms and conditions set forth therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)